Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2250
Office of Probation Administration; duties.

The office shall:

(1) Supervise and administer the system;

(2) Establish probation policies and standards for the system, with the concurrence of the Supreme Court; and

(3) Supervise offenders placed on probation in another state who are within the state pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 625, § 8;

Laws 1979, LB 536, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 35;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 4.
Laws 2003, LB 46, section 51, provided this section became operative "when thirty-five states have adopted the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision". By June 2002, the compact had reached this threshold. (See www.interstatecompact.org.) LB 46 became effective May 24, 2003.
Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, see section 29-2639.